New York, session 2025-2026, S8230.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 674 of the laws of 1993, amending the 2 public buildings law relating to value limitations on contracts, as 3 amended by section 1 of part J of chapter 55 of the laws of 2022, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall remain in full 6 force and effect only until June 30, [2025] 2028. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11897-01-5